Massachusetts, session 194th, S329.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The department of elementary and secondary education shall administer a grant program
for comprehensive high schools in Gateway Cities to construct 3,000-5,000 square-foot light
construction career and vocational technical education annex buildings on comprehensive high
school campuses outside of the Massachusetts School Building Authority process.
The career and vocational training offered within each annex will be aligned with
regional labor market demand and focused on the building trades.
The program is targeted for student populations who (i) are high school juniors or
seniors; (ii) have not been accepted into a dedicated vocational and trade school or program; (iii)
live in the public school's district; and (iv) will participate in dedicated Career and Vocational
Technical Education programs during regular school day hours.
of 2

The sum set forth in this section is hereby appropriated from the Education and
Transportation Fund...........................100,000,000
of 2